test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_aassad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - aassâđ: # MLO checked
    aassâđ+V+Inf: aassâđ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aasâm
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aasah
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: áásá
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ässeen
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: asâvettee
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: aassâv
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aassâp
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asâvetteđ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ääsih # info: äässih NOT correct
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aassim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aassih
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aasâi
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: aassáim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: aassáid
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: aassáin
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aasâim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aasâid
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: assii
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: asâččim
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: asâččih
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: asâččij
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: asâččáim
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: asâččáid
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: asâččáin
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: asâččijm
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: asâččijd
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: asâččii
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ässeem
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ässeeh
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: aasâš
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: asâžeen
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: aasâšvettee
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: asâžává
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: asâžep
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: aasâšvetteđ
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: asâžeh
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aasâ
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: áásus
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ássoon
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ässee
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: áássus
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: áássup
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aassâđ
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: áássus
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: aasâ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: asâččii
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: aasii
    aassâđ+V+PrsPrc: ässee
    aassâđ+V+PrfPrc: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Nom: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Ess: asâmin
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Loc: asâmist
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Ill: asâmân
    aassâđ+V+Ger: asâdijn
    aassâđ+V+VAbess: asâhánnáá



  Verb - njaahâđ: # MLO checked
    njaahâđ+V+Inf: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavâm
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njaavah
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njááhá
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njähheen
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njahâvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njaahâv
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njaahâp
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njahâvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njäähih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njaahim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njaahih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njaavâi
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njavváim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njavváid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njavváin
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njaavâim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njaavâid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njahhii
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: njavâččim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: njavâččih
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: njavâččij
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: njavâččáim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: njavâččáid
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: njavâččáin
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: njavâččijm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: njavâččijd
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: njavâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: njähheem
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: njähheeh
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: njaavâš
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: njavâžeen
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: njaavâšvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: njavâžává
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: njavâžep
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: njaavâšvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: njavâžeh
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njáávus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: njáhhoon
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njááhup
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: njavâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: njaavii
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+PrsPrc: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+PrfPrc: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Nom: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ess: njahâmin
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Loc: njahâmist
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ill: njahâmân
    njaahâđ+V+Ger: njavâdijn
    njaahâđ+V+VAbess: njavâhánnáá

  Verb - veerrâđ: # generated from FST:
    veerrâđ+V+Inf: veerrâđ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veerâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: veerah
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viärá
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: verreen
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: verâvettee
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: veerrâv
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: veerrâp
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: verâvetteđ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veerih
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: veerrim
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: veerrih
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: veerâi
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: verráim
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: verráid
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: verráin
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: veerâim
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: veerâid
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: verrii
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: verâččim
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: verâččih
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: verâččij
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: verâččáim
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: verâččáid
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: verâččáin
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: verâččijm
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: verâččijd
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: verâččii
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: verreem
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: verreeh
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: veerâš
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: verâžeen
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: veerâšvettee
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: verâžává
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: verâžep
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: veerâšvetteđ
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: verâžeh
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: veerâ
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: viärus
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: verree
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viärrus
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viärrup
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: veerrâđ
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viärrus
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: veerâ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: veerii
    veerrâđ+V+PrsPrc: verree
    veerrâđ+V+PrfPrc: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Nom: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Ess: verâmin
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Loc: verâmist
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Ill: verâmân

  Verb - caappâđ: # pp4 gradatino
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: cavváim
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: cavváid
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: cavváin
